North Dakota, session 69, SB2308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 6-09-43 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-09-43. Health information technology planning loan fund - Appropriation.
1. The health information technology planning loan fund is established in the Bank for the
purpose of providing low-interest loans to health care entities to assist those entities in
improving health information technology infrastructure. This fund is a revolving loan fund. All
moneys transferred into the fund, interest upon moneys in the fund, and collections of interest
and principal on loans made from the fund are appropriated for disbursement according to this
section.
2. The Bank shall make loans from this fund to health care entities as approved by the health
information technology office director, in collaboration with the health information technology

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 2
advisory committee, in accordance with the criteria established by the health information
technology director under section 54-59-26.
3. The Bank shall administer the health information technology planning loan fund. Funds in the
loan fund may be used for loans as provided under this section and the costs of administration
of the fund. Annually, the Bank may deduct a service fee for administering the revolving loan
fund maintained under this section.
4. An application for a loan under this section must be made to the health information technology
office. The health information technology office director, in collaboration with the health
information technology advisory committee, may approve the application of a qualified
applicant that meets the criteria established by the health information technology office
director. The health information technology office shall forward approved applications to the
Bank. Upon approval of the application by the Bank, the Bank shall make the loan from the
revolving loan fund as provided under this section.
5. The Bank may do all acts necessary to negotiate loans and preserve security as deemed
necessary, to exercise any right of redemption, and to bring suit in order to collect interest and
principal due the revolving loan fund under mortgages, contracts, and notes executed to
obtain loans under this section. If the applicant's plan for financing provides for a loan of funds
from sources other than the state of North Dakota, the Bank may make a loan subordinate
security interest. The Bank may recover from the revolving loan fund amounts actually
expended by the Bank for legal fees and to effect a redemption.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 15.1-01-04 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
j. The following gubernatorial appointees:
(1) An individual representing the statewide longitudinal data system committee;
(2) An individual representing tribal school interests;
(3)(2) An individual employed as a public school administrator;
(4)(3) An individual employed as a public school principal;
(5)(4) An individual employed as a public elementary school teacher;
(6)(5) An individual employed as a public secondary school teacher;
(7)(6) A director of a special education unit; and
(8)(7) A director of a regional education association.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-07-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-07-33. Student information system - Exemption.
1. Notwithstanding any other technology requirements imposed by the superintendent of public
instruction or the information technology department, each school district shall implement the
state student information system administered by the information technology
departmentsuperintendent of public instruction and use it as its principal student information
system. Each school district shall use a state course code, assigned by the department of
public instruction, to identify all local classes in the state student information system.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 3
2. The statewide longitudinal data system committeesuperintendent of public instruction may
exempt a school district from having to implement and utilize the state student information
system if the school district demonstrates that:
a. The district has acquired and is using a student information system determined to be
compatible with the statewide longitudinal data system; or
b. In accordance with requirements of the bureau of Indian education, the district has
acquired and is utilizing a student information system that is determined to be
comparable by the superintendent.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 23-35-02.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23-35-02.2. Public health units to adopt onsite wastewater recycling treatment guide.
Each public health unit shall adopt the statewide technical guide for onsite wastewater recycling
treatment technologies and sewage distribution technologies established by the onsite wastewater
recycling technical committeedepartment of environmental quality.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 23.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Standards for well drilling and installation of water well pumps, pitless units, and monitoring
wells - Reports required.
1. All construction of water wells must comply with the rules adopted by the department of
environmental quality.
2. All installation of water well pumps and pitless units must comply with the rules adopted by the
department of environmental quality.
3. All monitoring wells constructed must comply with the rules adopted by the department of
environmental quality. Each monitoring well contractor shall furnish all reports required by the
rules of the department.
4. All drilling of geothermal systems must comply with the rules adopted by the department of
environmental quality and the state geologist.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 50-06-01.4 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The department includes the state hospital, the regional human service centers, a vocational
rehabilitation unit, public health division, and other units or offices and administrative and fiscal
support services as the commissioner of the department determines necessary. The
department must be structured to promote efficient and effective operations and, consistent
with fulfilling its prescribed statutory duties, shall act as the official agency of the state in the
discharge of the following functions not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another
state agency:
a. (1) Administration of programs for children and families, including adoption services
and the licensure of child-placing agencies, foster care services and the licensure of
foster care arrangements, certification of shelter care services, child protection
services, children's trust fund, licensure of early childhood programs, refugee
services, in-home community-based services, quality control, and administration of
the interstate compacts on the placement of children and juveniles, and the early
childhood services advisory board.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 4
(2) Administration of programs to identify all available options for effectively maximizing
the provision of early childhood services within the state and address the
coordinated utilization of facilities and personnel for the provision of early childhood
services within the state.
b. Administration of programs for individuals with developmental disabilities, including
licensure of facilities and services, the establishment funding for family members and
corporate guardianships, and the design and implementation of a community-based
service system for persons in need of habilitation.
c. Administration of aging service programs, including nutrition, transportation, advocacy,
social, ombudsman, recreation, and related services funded under the Older Americans
Act of 1965 [42 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.], home and community-based services, licensure of
adult foster care homes, and the committee on aging.
d. Administration of behavioral health programs, including reviewing and identifying service
needs and activities in the state's behavioral health system in an effort to ensure health
and safety, access to services, and quality of services; establishing quality assurance
standards for the licensure of substance use disorder program services and facilities;
providing policy leadership in partnership with public and private entities; and providing
chronic disease management, regional intervention services, and twenty-four-hour crisis
services for individuals with behavioral health disorders.
e. Administration of economic assistance programs, including temporary assistance for
needy families, the supplemental nutrition assistance program, home energy assistance,
child care assistance, refugee assistance, work experience, work incentive, and quality
control.
f. Administration of medical service programs, including medical assistance for children's
health insurance program, Medicaid waivers, early and periodic screening, diagnosis and
treatment, utilization control, autism services, and claims processing.
g. Administration of general assistance.
h. Administration of child support.
i. Administration of program, services, and licensing outlined in title 23 and other previous
duties of the state department of health and state health council.
j. Administration of a program to improve the quality of life for an individual with brain injury
and the individual's family through brain injury awareness, prevention, research,
education, collaboration, support services, and advocacy.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 52-02-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
52-02-02. Powers, duties, organization, and methods of procedure of bureau - Seal.
The bureau may adopt, amend, or rescind such rules and regulations, make such expenditures,
require such reports, make such investigations, and take such other action as it deems necessary or
suitable in the administration of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. Such rulesAll rules
and regulations are effective upon publication in the manner, not inconsistent with the provisions of the
North Dakota unemployment compensation law, which the bureau shall prescribe. The bureau shall
determine its own organization and methods of procedure in accordance with the provisions of the
North Dakota unemployment compensation law and shall have an official seal which shall be noticed
judicially.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 5
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 52-02-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
52-02-08. Bureau and advisory councils to take steps to stabilize employment.
The bureau, with the advice and aid of its advisory councils, and through its appropriate divisions,
shall take appropriate steps to:
1. Reduce and prevent unemployment.
2. Encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of career and technical education
training, retraining, and career development counseling.
3. Investigate, recommend, advise, and assist in the establishment and operation, by
municipalities, counties, school districts, and the state, of reserves for public works to be used
in times of business depression and unemployment.
4. Promote the re-employment of unemployed workers throughout the state in every other way
that may be feasible.
5. Carry on and publish the results of investigations and research studies.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-07-01.2 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Notwithstanding sections 2-05-01, 4.1-05-02, 4.1-26-02, 6-01-03, 6-09-02.1, 12-55.1-02,
12-59-01, 15-39.1-05.1, 15.1-01-01, 15.1-13-02, 20.1-02-23, 23.1-01-02, 36-01-01,
37-18.1-01, 50-06-05.6, 54-34.3-10, 54-54-02, 55-01-01, and 61-02-04, all members of the
following boards and commissions must, subject to the limitations of this section, be
considered to have resigned from such boards and commissions effective January first of the
first year of each four-year term of the governor:
a. The aeronautics commission.
b. The milk marketing board.
c. The dairy promotion commission.
d. The state banking board.
e. The state credit union board.
f. The advisory board of directors to the Bank of North Dakota.
g. The pardon advisory board.
h. The state parole board.
i. The state board of public school education.
j. The education standards and practices board.
k. The board of trustees of the teachers' fund for retirement.
l. The state game and fish advisory board.
m. The environmental review advisory council.
n. The board of animal health.
o. The administrative committee on veterans' affairs.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 6
p. The committee on aging.
q. The commission on the status of women.
r. The North Dakota council on the arts.
s.q. The state historical board.
t.r. The state water commission.
SECTION 10. A new section to chapter 54-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Boards review task force - Report to legislative management .
1. The office of the governor shall provide staffing and administrative services to the boards
review task force. The task force shall:
a. Review and assess all boards, commissions, committees, councils, and task forces for
inefficiencies and duplication of responsibilities; and
b. Make recommendations to the legislative assembly regarding minimizing and
streamlining government operations through the consolidation or elimination of boards,
commissions, committees, councils, and task forces.
2. In addition to the governor or the governor's designee, who shall serve as the presiding officer
of the task force, the task force must include:
a. A member of the senate, appointed by the senate majority leader.
b. A member of the house of representatives, appointed by the house of representatives
majority leader.
c. A representative of an organization representing cities, appointed by the governor.
d. A representative of an organization representing counties, appointed by the governor.
e. A representative of the business community, appointed by the governor.
f. A representative of an occupational licensing board, appointed by the governor.
g. A member at large, appointed by the governor.
3. A member of the task force who is not a state employee is entitled to reimbursement for
mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees, to be paid by the
office of the governor. A state employee who is a member of the task force is entitled to
receive that employee's regular salary and is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and
expenses to be paid by the employing agency. A member of the task force who is a member of
the legislative assembly is entitled to receive per diem compensation at the rate provided
under section 54 - 35 - 10 for each day performing official duties of the task force. The legislative
council shall pay the per diem compensation and reimbursement for travel and expenses as
provided by law for any member of the task force who is a member of the legislative assembly.
4. Before October 1, 2026, the task force shall provide a report of its findings and
recommendations and any proposed legislation necessary to implement the recommendations
to the legislative management.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 54-54-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 7
54-54-05. Duties of council.
The duties of the council are:
1. To stimulate and encourage throughout the state the study and presentation of the performing
and fine arts and public interest and participation therein.
2. To make such surveys as may be deemed advisable of public and private institutions engaged
within the state in artistic and cultural activities, including but not limited to, music, theater,
dance, painting, sculpture, architecture, and allied arts and crafts, and to make
recommendations concerning appropriate methods to encourage participation in and
appreciation of the arts to meet the legitimate needs and aspirations of persons in all parts of
the state.
3. To take such steps as may be necessary and appropriate to encourage public interest in the
cultural heritage of our state and to expand the state's cultural resources.
4. To encourage and assist freedom of artistic expression essential for the well-being of the arts.
5. To determine the artistic value of property as provided by section 1-08-04.1.
6. To administer a poet laureate program that selects the poet laureate and requires the poet
laureate to participate in at least four public events around the state each year.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-26. Health information technology office - Duties - Loan and grant programs.
1. The health information technology office is created in the department. The health information
technology advisory committee shall make recommendations to the health information
technology office for implementing an interoperable health information infrastructure that is
consistent with emerging national standards; promote the adoption and use of electronic
health records and other health information technologies; and promote interoperability of
health information systems for the purpose of improving health care quality, patient safety, and
the overall efficiency of health care and public health services.
2. The health information technology office director, in collaboration with the health information
technology advisory committee, shall:
a. Apply for federal funds that may be available to assist the state and health care providers
in implementing and improving health information technology.
b. Implement and administer a health information exchange that utilizes information
infrastructure and systems in a secure and cost-effective manner to facilitate the
collection, storage, and transmission of health records.
c. Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for the use of health information, use of the health
information exchange, and participation in the health information exchange.
d. Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for accessing the health information exchange to ensure
appropriate and required privacy and security protections and relating to the authority of
the director to suspend, eliminate, or terminate the right to participate in the health
information exchange.
e. Establish a health information technology planning loan program to provide low-interest
loans to health care entities to assist those entities in improving their health information
technology infrastructure under section 6-09-43.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 8
f. Facilitate and expand electronic health information exchange in the state, directly or by
awarding grants.
g. Establish an application process and eligibility criteria for and accept and process
applications for loans and grants under subdivisions e and f. The eligibility criteria must
be consistent with federal requirements associated with federal funds received under
subdivision a. The eligibility criteria for loans under subdivision f must include a
requirement that the recipient's approved health information technology be strategically
aligned with the state's health information technology plan and the associated federal
standards and that the recipient has passed an onsite electronic medical record
readiness assessment conducted by an assessment team determined by the health
information technology advisory committee and the health information technology office
director.
h. Determine fees and charges for access and participation in the health information
exchange. Any moneys collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the
electronic health information exchange fund.
i. Consult and coordinate with the department of health and human services to facilitate the
collection of health information from health care providers and state agencies for public
health purposes, including identifiable health information that may be used by state
agencies, departments, or institutions to comply with applicable state or federal laws.
3. If the health information technology advisory committee determines that establishing a health
information exchange with another state or states will assist in providing health information
exchange services in a cost-effective manner, theThe health information technology office
director, in collaboration with the health information technology advisory committee, may join
with another state or states to establish, implement, and administer a health information
exchange consistent with other provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-27. Health information technology office - Electronic health information exchange
fund.
1. There is created an electronic health information exchange fund. The fund consists of moneys
deposited in the fund from federal or other sources or moneys transferred into the fund as
directed by the legislative assembly. The health information technology office shall administer
this fund and shall distribute moneys in the fund accordingly. The moneys in the fund must be
used to facilitate and expand electronic health information exchange. Moneys in the fund may
be used, subject to legislative appropriations, to provide services directly, for grants as
provided under this section, and for the costs of administration of the fund.
2. A grant applicant shall submit an application to the health information technology office, which
shall determine the applicant's eligibility based upon criteria established by the health
information technology office director in collaboration with the health information technology
advisory committee.
3. This section does not create an entitlement to any funds available for grants under this
section. The health information technology office may award these grants to the extent funds
are available and, within the office's discretion, to the extent such applications are approved.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-34 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 9
54-59-34. Statewide longitudinal data system committee - Information technology
department - Duties.
1. The statewide longitudinal data system committeedepartment shall manage a statewide
longitudinal data system among education, workforce, and training entities that:
a. Provides for the dissemination of management information to stakeholders and partners
of state education, training, and employment systems;
b. Is required to provide on an annual basis to education and workforce development
programs, to the extent permitted by federal law, the wage record interchange system 2
data sharing agreement and the state wage interchange system data sharing agreement
and state performance reports that measure the aggregate outcomes of participants in
the workforce and continuing education programs, including private workforce and
education programs that request the reports; and
c. Uses data from educational and workforce systems as central sources of statewide
longitudinal data.
2. The department may, subject to federal and state privacy laws, enter interagency agreements,
including agreements designating authorized representatives of the educational agencies
participating in the system, under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act [20 U.S.C.
1232(g); 34 CFR 99].
3. The statewide longitudinal data system committeedepartment shall establish policies and
adopt rules addressing access to and the collection, storage, and sharing of information and
the systems necessary to perform those functions, subject to applicable federal and state
privacy laws and interagency agreements and restrictions relating to confidential information
required to conform to applicable federal and state privacy laws.
3.4. The statewide longitudinal data system committeedepartment shall provide operational
oversight for information sharing activities and make recommendations for and provide
oversight of information sharing budgets.
4.5. The statewide longitudinal data system committee in consultation with the information
technology department shall:
a. Establish the terms and conditions under which a person may be authorized to access
data through the statewide longitudinal data system;
b. Direct that all statewide longitudinal data system administrators implement approved data
protection practices to ensure the security of electronic and physical data, provided that
the practices include requirements for encryption and staff training;
c. Provide for biennial privacy and security audits of the statewide longitudinal data system;
d. Establish protocols, including procedures, for the notification of students and parents in
the event of a data breach involving the statewide longitudinal data system;
e. Require that data retention and disposition by the statewide longitudinal data system be
governed by the same policies as those instituted for the information technology
department; and
f. Require the provision of annual training regarding data protection to any individuals who
have access to the statewide longitudinal data system, including school district
employees, employees of the North Dakota university system office and institutions
under the control of the state board of higher education, and elected or appointed state
or local governmental officials.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 10
6. The department may authorize studies to benefit and improve workforce training and
education.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-36. Statewide longitudinal data system committee - Report to legislative management.
During each interim the statewide longitudinal data system committeedepartment shall provide a
report regarding the statewide longitudinal data system to one or more committees designated by the
legislative management and shall provide recommendations for further development, cost proposals,
proposals for legislation, and recommendations for data sharing governance.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-37 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-37. Statewide longitudinal data system committee - Continuing appropriation.
The statewide longitudinal data system committeedepartment may solicit and receive gifts, grants,
and donations from public and private sources. Any moneys received in accordance with this section
are appropriated on a continuing basis for the support of the statewide longitudinal data system.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-39 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-39. State agencies - Mandatory provision of information - Confidentiality.
1. The information technology department may request from any state agency:
a. All information required by 20 U.S.C. 9871(e)(2)(D);
b. Any other educational information the statewide longitudinal data system committee
determines is required for a longitudinal data system to comply with state or federal law;
and
c. Unemployment insurance wage data from job service North Dakota for education and
workforce development program evaluations, except that the information technology
department may not redisclose any data identifying an individual unless the redisclosure
is expressly permitted by a written agreement between job service North Dakota and the
department or is otherwise expressly permitted or required by federal or state law.
2. A state agency providing information requested under subsection 1 shall enter an interagency
agreement with the department which identifies applicable federal and state privacy laws and
agency-established restrictions relating to its confidential information the agency has
determined is required to comply with federal and state privacy laws.
3. Subject to applicable restrictions on the use and disclosure of confidential information required
to comply with federal and state privacy laws and the terms of the interagency agreement, any
state agency receiving a request for information under subsection 1 shall provide the
information at the time and in the manner required by the information technology department.
SECTION 18. AMENDMENT. Section 61-03-01.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-03-01.3. Director - State engineer - Powers and duties.
1. The director shall:
a. Enforce all rules adopted by the department;

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 11
b. Hire a state engineer who is a qualified professional engineer, has appropriate hydrology
experience, and will report to the director;
c. Hire other employees as necessary to carry out the duties of the department and
director;
d. Organize the department in an efficient manner; and
e. Take any other action necessary and appropriate for administration of the department.
f. Adopt rules to license water well contractors, water well pump and pitless unit installers,
monitoring well contractors, and geothermal system drillers.
g. Advise the governor and the state water commission regarding operations of Devils Lake
outlets.
h. Recommend an operational plan for the Devils Lake outlet based on Sheyenne River
capacity and water quality considerations.
2. The state engineer is responsible for and shall manage the department's oversight of dam
safety, water appropriations, and construction and drainage permits, and associated technical
duties related to public safety and property protection.
SECTION 19. A new section to chapter 61-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Water well contractors advisory board.
1. The water well contractors advisory board is established and consists of:
a. The director, or director's designee.
b. Three water well contractors, appointed by the governor.
c. One geothermal system driller or one monitoring well contractor, appointed by the
governor.
d. One water well pump and pitless unit installer, appointed by the governor.
e. One member at large, appointed by the governor.
2. The advisory board:
a. Shall advise the department in the adoption and implementation of rules for the
certification and regulation of water well contractors, water well pump and pitless unit
installers, monitoring well contractors, and geothermal system drillers.
b. May receive reports from the department on the status and activities of the certification
and regulation of water well contractors, water well pump and pitless unit installers,
monitoring well contractors, and geothermal system drillers.
c. May provide recommendations to the department and the legislative management on the
certification and regulation of water well contractors, water well pump and pitless unit
installers, monitoring well contractors, and geothermal system drillers.
d. Shall collaborate with the department to manage the fiduciary responsibilities of
certification and regulation of water well contractors, water well pump and pitless unit
installers, monitoring well contractors, and geothermal system drillers.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 12
SECTION 20. A new section to chapter 61-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Requirements for firms engaged in water well work, installation of water well pumps and
pitless units, monitoring well work, and drilling of geothermal systems - Exceptions.
1. A person, partnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company may not engage in
the business of constructing a water well in this state unless at all times a certified water well
contractor, who is responsible for the proper construction or alteration of a water well, is in
charge. This section does not prohibit any person, partnership, association, corporation, or
limited liability company from constructing any water well on the person's or entity's own
premises for the person's or entity's own use.
2. A person may not engage in the business of installing water well pumps and pitless units in
the state after July 1, 1986, unless a certified installer, who is responsible for the proper
installation of the pump and pitless unit, is in charge of the installation. This chapter does not
prohibit any person from installing water well pumps and pitless units on that person's own
premises for that person's own use.
3. A person may not engage in the business of constructing a monitoring well in this state unless
at all times a certified monitoring well contractor, who is responsible for the proper construction
or alteration of the monitoring well, is in charge. This section does not prohibit any person from
installing a monitoring well on that person's own premises for that person's own use.
4. A person may not engage in the business of drilling geothermal systems in the state after
July 1, 2008, unless a certified driller, who is responsible for the proper drilling of the
geothermal system, is in charge of the drilling. This section does not prohibit a person from
drilling geothermal systems on that person's own premises for that person's own use.
5. Within thirty days after the completion of each well, each water well contractor shall report to
the department, on forms provided by the department, any information required by the
department, including a log of formations penetrated, well depth, and casing size and weight.
Each water well contractor shall provide a copy of the report to the customer. All information
submitted to the department must remain the property of the department.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-03. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Board" means the North Dakota atmospheric resource board which, in the exercise of the
powers granted under this chapter, has all of the powers of an administrative agency as
defined in chapter 28-32.
2. "Controller" refers to any licensee duly authorized in this state to engage in weather
modification operations.
3.2. "Geographical region" means a geographical area with a contiguous boundary that may
enclose a portion of any county or counties.
4.3. "Hail suppression" refers to the activation of any process that will reduce, modify, suppress,
eliminate, or soften hail formed in clouds or storms.
5.4. "Increasing precipitation" refers to the activation of any process that will actually result in
greater amounts of moisture reaching the ground in any area from a cloud or cloud system
than would have occurred naturally.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 13
6.5. "Initiating precipitation" refers to the process of causing precipitation from clouds which could
not otherwise have occurred naturally or inducing precipitation significantly earlier than would
have occurred naturally.
7.6. "Operation" means the performance of any weather modification activity undertaken for the
purpose of producing or attempting to produce any form of modifying effect upon the weather
within a limited geographical area or within a limited period of time.
8.7. "Research and development" means exploration, field experimentation, and extension of
investigative findings and theories of a scientific or technical nature into practical application
for experimental and demonstration purposes, including the experimental production of
models, devices, equipment, materials, and processes.
9.8. "Weather modification" means and extends to the control, alteration, and amelioration of
weather elements, including man-caused changes in the natural precipitation process, hail
suppression or modification, and alteration of other weather phenomena, including clouds,
temperature, wind direction, and velocity, and the initiating, increasing, decreasing, and
otherwise modifying by artificial methods of precipitation in the form of rain, snow, hail, mist, or
fog through cloud seeding, electrification, or by other means to provide immediate practical
benefits.
10.9. "Weather modification authority" means the governing body created by a board of county
commissioners under section 61-04.1-22.1, 61-04.1-23, 61-04.1-27, 61-04.1-29, or
61-04.1-31.
SECTION 22. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-08. Powers and duties of boardthe department.
The boarddepartment has the following powers and duties:
1. The board shall appoint an executive director to serve at the board's discretion and to perform
duties assigned by the board.
2. The board shall authorize the employment of staff the board deems necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter. The executive director shall hire the staff, subject to the approval of
the board.
3. The boarddepartment shall adopt rules concerning qualifications, procedures, and conditions
for issuance, revocation, suspension, and modification of licenses and permits; standards and
instructions governing weather modification operations, including monitoring and evaluation,
recordkeeping, and reporting, and the boarddepartment shall establish procedures and forms
for this recordkeeping and reporting. The boarddepartment may adopt all other rules
necessary to the administration of this chapter. The provisions of chapter 28-32 apply to this
chapter and rules of the boarddepartment must be published in the North Dakota
Administrative Code.
4.2. The boarddepartment may contract with any person to carry out weather modification
operations and, in connection with regulated weather modification operations in a county or
geographical region, shall carry on monitoring and evaluation activities.
5.3. The boarddepartment may order any person who is conducting weather modification
operations in violation of this chapter or any rules adopted to implement this chapter, to cease
and desist from those operations and the order is enforceable in any court of competent
jurisdiction within this state.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 14
6.4. The boarddepartment may cooperate and contract with any person engaged in activities
similar to the work of the boarddepartment and may make contracts and agreements to carry
out programs consistent with the purpose and intent of this chapter. The boarddepartment
may request and accept any grants of funds or services from any person and expend these
funds or use these services to carry out this chapter.
7.5. The boarddepartment shall monitor the current state of knowledge regarding the magnitude
and impacts of possible regional and global climatic changes and shall provide information to
other state agencies that may benefit from this knowledge.
8.6. The boarddepartment shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and do all
things reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
9.7. The boarddepartment may plan and study a hail suppression pilot program that would provide
urban and rural hail suppression operations statewide or to any portion of the state.
SECTION 23. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-09. BoardDepartment of water resources to establish research and development
program - Hail suppression pilot program.
1. The boarddepartment of water resources shall establish a program of weather modification
research and development in this state. The boarddepartment shall supervise and coordinate
all research and development activities in the state or research and development activities
outside of the state participated in or conducted by any state institution or state or county
agency.
2. If the boarddepartment plans and studies a hail suppression pilot program, the
boarddepartment may conduct a planning phase that includes studying the impact on the
environment, providing public education, and formulating an operations plan.
SECTION 24. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-12. Exemptions.
The boarddepartment of water resources may provide by rule for exemption of the following
activities from the license and permit requirements of section 61-04.1-11:
1. Research and development conducted by the state, political subdivisions of the state, colleges
and universities of the state, agencies of the federal government, or bona fide research
corporations.
2. Weather modification operations of an emergency nature taken against fire, frost, or fog.
Exempted activities shallmust be conducted so as not to unduly interfere with weather modification
operations conducted under a permit issued in accordance with this chapter.
SECTION 25. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-14. Issuance of license - Fee.
The boarddepartment of water resources shall provide, by rule, the procedure and criteria for the
issuance of a license. The boarddepartment, in accordance with its rules, shall issue a weather
modification license to each applicant who:
1. Pays a license fee of fifty dollars.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 15
2. Demonstrates competence to engage in weather modification operations, to the satisfaction of
the boarddepartment.
3. Designates an agent for the service of process pursuant to section 61-04.1-13 or chapter
10-19.1.
Each license issued by the board shall bedepartment is nontransferable and shall expireexpires on
December thirty-first of the year of issuance. A license shall beis revocable for cause at any time prior to
such date if, after holding a hearing upon due notice, the board shall determinedepartment determines
that cause for revocation exists. License fees collected by the board shalldepartment must be paid into
the general fund in the state treasury.
SECTION 26. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-15. Revocation or suspension of license.
The boarddepartment of water resources may suspend or revoke a license for any of the following
reasons:
1. Incompetency.
2. Dishonest practice.
3. False or fraudulent representations made in obtaining a license or permit under this chapter.
4. Failure to comply with any provisions of this chapter or any rules adopted by the
boarddepartment pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 27. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-16. Permit required - Issuance of permit - Fee.
1. A weather modification permit shall beis required for each geographical area, as set out in the
operational plan required by subdivision b, in which a person intends to conduct weather
modification operations. Each permit issued by the board shall expiredepartment of water
resources expires on December thirty-first of the year of issuance. A person applying for a
weather modification operational permit shall file an application with the boarddepartment, in
such form as the board shall prescribedepartment prescribes, which application shallmust be
accompanied by an application fee of twenty-five dollars and contain such information as the
boarddepartment, by rule, may require, and in addition, each applicant for a permit shall:
a. Furnish proof of financial responsibility as provided by section 61-04.1-19.
b. Set forth a complete operational plan for the proposed operation which shallmust include
a specific statement of its nature and object, a map of the proposed operating area which
specifies the primary target area for the proposed operation and shows the area that is
reasonably expected to be affected by such operation, a statement of the approximate
time during which the operation is to be conducted, a list of the materials and methods to
be used in conducting the operation, and such other detailed information as may be
needed to describe the operation.
2. The boarddepartment may issue the permit if it determines that:
a. The applicant holds a valid weather modification license issued under this chapter.
b. The applicant has furnished satisfactory proof of financial responsibility in accordance
with section 61-04.1-19.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 16
c. The applicant has paid the required application fee.
d. The operation:
(1) Is reasonably conceived to improve water quantity or quality, reduce loss from
weather hazards, provide economic benefits for the people of this state, advance
scientific knowledge, or otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Is designed to include adequate safeguards to minimize or avoid possible damage
to the public health, safety, welfare, or the environment.
(3) Will not adversely affect another operation for which a permit has been issued.
e. The applicant has North Dakota workforce safety and insurance coverage for all
employees working in this state.
f. The applicant has furnished a performance bond as required by section 61-04.1-34.
g. The applicant has complied with such other requirements for the issuance of permits as
may be required by the rules and regulations of the boarddepartment.
h. The applicant has furnished a bid bond.
i. The applicant has registered, with the North Dakota aeronautics commission, any aircraft
intended to be used in connection with the operation.
To carry out the objectives and purposes of this chapter, the boarddepartment may condition
and limit permits as to primary target areas, time of the operation, materials, equipment, and
methods to be used in conducting the operation, emergency shutdown procedure, emergency
assistance, and such other operational requirements as may be established by the
boarddepartment.
3. The board shalldepartment may issue only one permit at a time for operations in any
geographical area if two or more operations conducted in such an area according to permit
limitations might adversely interfere with one another.
4. All permit fees collected by the board shalldepartment must be paid into the general fund of
the state treasury.
SECTION 28. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-17. Hearings.
The boarddepartment of water resources shall give public notice, in the official county newspaper or
newspapers in the area of the state reasonably expected to be affected by operations conducted under
a permit, that it is considering an application for such permit, and, if objection to the issuance of the
permit is received by the boarddepartment within twenty days, the boarddepartment may hold a public
hearing for the purpose of obtaining information from the public concerning the effects of issuing the
permit. The boarddepartment may also hold such hearings upon its own motion.
SECTION 29. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-18. Revocation, suspension, or modification of permit.
The boarddepartment of water resources may suspend or revoke a permit if it appears that the
permittee no longer has the qualifications necessary for the issuance of an original permit or has
violated any provision of this chapter, or any of the rules adopted under it.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 17
The boarddepartment may revise the conditions and limits of a permit if:
1. The permittee is given notice and a reasonable opportunity for a hearing, to be held in
accordance with chapter 28-32.
2. It appears to the boarddepartment that a modification of the conditions and limits of a permit is
necessary to protect the public's health, safety, welfare, or the environment.
If it appears to the boarddepartment that an emergency situation exists or is impending which could
endanger the public's health, safety, welfare, or the environment, the boarddepartment may, without
prior notice or hearing, immediately modify the conditions or limits of a permit, or order temporary
suspension of a permit. The issuance of such an order shallmust include notice of a hearing to be held
within ten days thereafter on the question of permanently modifying the conditions and limits or
continuing the suspension of the permit. Failure to comply with an order temporarily suspending an
operation or modifying the conditions and limits of a permit shall beis grounds for immediate revocation
of the license and permit of the person controlling or engaged in the operation.
SECTION 30. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-19. Proof of financial responsibility.
Proof of financial responsibility is made by showing to the satisfaction of the boarddepartment of
water resources that the permittee has the ability to respond in damages to liability which might
reasonably result from the operation for which the permit is sought. Such proofProof of financial
responsibility may be shown by:
1. Presentation to the boarddepartment of proof of a prepaid noncancelable insurance policy
against such liability, in an amount approved by the boarddepartment.
2. Filing with the boarddepartment a corporate surety bond, cash, or negotiable securities in an
amount approved by the boarddepartment.
SECTION 31. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-20. BoardDepartment of water resources may create operating districts -
Representation of noncontracting counties.
The boarddepartment of water resources may place any county or geographical region for which a
person contracts with the state for weather modification operations in any operational district the
boarddepartment determines necessary to best provide that county or geographical region with the
benefits of weather modification. In determining the boundaries of an operating district, the
boarddepartment shall consider the patterns of crops within the state, climatic patterns, and the
limitations of aircraft and other technical equipment. The boarddepartment may assign any county that
has not created a weather modification authority under this chapter to an operating district solely for the
purpose of representation on the operations committee of that district.
SECTION 32. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-21. District operations advisory committees created - Duties.
1. There must be a district operations advisory committee in each operations district created in
accordance with section 61-04.1-20. Each committee must be composed of one commissioner
of the weather modification authority, if a weather modification authority exists, from each
county within the district; a representative of each person contracting for a geographical region
assigned to the district; and one member of the board of county commissioners from each
county assigned to the district. Each advisory committee, upon majority vote, with the

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 18
concurrence of the boarddepartment of water resources, shall adopt rules and bylaws
necessary to govern that committee's procedures and meetings. Each committee shall
evaluate weather modification operations within that committee's district and make
recommendations and proposals to the boarddepartment concerning these operations.
2. The weather modification authority of any county authorized to contract for weather
modification operations under this chapter which is not assigned to an operations district shall
assume the functions of the district operations committee and may exercise the powers and
duties assigned to the operations committees by this chapter and by the rules of the
boarddepartment.
SECTION 33. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-33. Bids required - When.
WheneverIf the board shall undertake to contractdepartment of water resources contracts with any
licensed controller in an amount in excess of ten thousand dollars in any one year, the boarddepartment
shall advertise for proposals for such weather modification activities and, in its proceedings with respect
to bids therefor, shall substantially follow the manner and form required by the laws of this state for the
purchase of supplies by the office of management and budget. The board shalldepartment may not
enter into noa contract or agreement for weather modification services except with a controller, holding
the permit as required by this chapter, except for the purpose of gathering technical information, and
making studies or surveys.
SECTION 34. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-34 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-34. Performance bond, cash, or negotiable securities required.
Before the board shall contractdepartment of water resources contracts with any controller, itthe
department shall require the controller to furnish a surety bond or cash or negotiable securities for the
faithful performance of the contract in such amount as determined by the boarddepartment, conditioned
that the licensee and the licensee's agents will in all respects faithfully perform all weather modification
contracts undertaken with the boarddepartment and will comply with all provisions of this chapter and
the contract entered into by the boarddepartment and the licensee.
SECTION 35. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-37 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-37. Liability of controller.
1. An operation conducted under the license and permit requirements of this chapter is not an
ultrahazardous or abnormally dangerous activity which makes the permittee subject to liability
without fault.
2. Dissemination of materials and substances into the atmosphere by a permittee acting within
the conditions and limits of the permittee's permit shalldo not constitute trespass.
3. Except as provided in this section and in section 61-04.1-36, nothing in this chapter shalldoes
not prevent any person adversely affected by a weather modification operation from
recovering damages resulting from negligent or intentionally harmful conduct by a permittee.
4. The fact that a person holds a license or was issued a permit under this chapter, or that the
person has complied with the rules adopted by the board pursuant todepartment of water
resources under this chapter, is not admissible as a defense in any legal action which may be
brought against the person.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 19
SECTION 36. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-38 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-38. BoardDepartment of water resources may receive and expend funds.
1. The boarddepartment of water resources may receive and accept in the name of the state any
funds that are offered or become available from any federal grant or appropriation, private gift,
donation, or bequest, county funds, or funds from any other source except license and permit
fees, and to expend these funds for the expense of administering this chapter, and, with the
exception of county funds and funds from any other person contracting with the
boarddepartment for weather modification operations, for the encouragement of research and
development in weather modification by any private person, the North Dakota state university,
the university of North Dakota, or any other appropriate state, county, or public agency in this
state by direct grant, contract, or other means.
2. All federal grants, federal appropriations, private gifts, donations, or bequests, county funds, or
funds from any other source except license and permit fees, received by the boarddepartment
must be paid over to the state treasurer, who shall credit this amount to a special fund in the
state treasury known as the state weather modification fundthe water commission fund. All
proceeds deposited by the state treasurer in the state weather modificationwater commission
fund are appropriated to the boarddepartment and, if expended, must be disbursed by
warrant-check prepared by the office of management and budget upon vouchers submitted by
the boarddepartment and must be used for the purpose of paying for the expense of
administration of this chapter and, with the exception of county funds or funds from any other
person contracting with the boarddepartment for weather modification operations, for the
encouragement of research and development in weather modification by any private person,
the North Dakota state university, the university of North Dakota, or any other appropriate
state, county, or public agency by direct grant, contract, or other means.
SECTION 37. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04.1-39 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-04.1-39. Payment for weather modification - State to provide funds.
Any weather modification authority or person that contracted with the boarddepartment of water
resources for weather modification operations under this chapter shall appropriate to the state weather
modificationwater commission fund the amount determined by the boarddepartment to be necessary to
provide that weather modification authority or person with weather modification operations. The
boarddepartment may expend, from the state weather modificationwater commission fund, the funds
the boarddepartment deems necessary to provide a contracting weather modification authority or
person with weather modification operations.
SECTION 38. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 65-02-03.1 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. A departing member representing an employer must be replaced by a member
representing an employer, most of whose employees are in a different rate classification
than those of the employer represented by the departing member. The governor shall
appoint the member for an employer representative from a list of three potential
candidates submitted by a coordinating committee appointed by the governor, composed
ofan organization of business associations. The organization shall accept qualified
candidate recommendations received from representatives from the associated general
contractors of North Dakota, the North Dakota petroleum council, the greater North
Dakota chamber of commerce, the North Dakota motor carriers association, the North
Dakota hospital association, the national federation of independent business, the lignite
energy council, and other statewide business interests.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 20
SECTION 39. REPEAL. Chapter 8-11.1, sections 12-48-06.1, 15.1-37-05, 15.1-37-06, and
15.1-37-08, chapter 17-07, sections 19-24.1-38, 19-24.1-39, and 23-35-02.3, chapters 34-16 and
43-35, sections 50-06-05.6, 50-06.4-10, 50-11.1-25, 50-11.1-26, 50-11.1-27, 52-02-07, 54-34.3-10,
54-54-10, 54-59-25, 54-59-33, 54-59-35, 54-59-38, 54-60-25, 61-04.1-04, 61-04.1-05, 61-04.1-06,
61-04.1-07, and 61-04.1-10, and chapter 61-36 of the North Dakota Century Code are repealed.
SECTION 40. REPEAL. Sections 55-01-13 and 55-01-14 of the North Dakota Century Code are
repealed.
SECTION 41. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 40 of this Act is effective December 31, 2026.
SECTION 42. EXPIRATION DATE. Sections 10 and 19 of this Act are effective through
December 1, 2026, and after that date are ineffective.

S. B. NO. 2308 - PAGE 21
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2308.
Senate Vote: Yeas 27 Nays 19 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 78 Nays 12 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State